ru: Материал хвостовика: Алюминий; Пластик; Другое
en: Nock material: Aluminum; Plastic; Other
pt-BR: Material do entalhe: Alumínio; Plástico; Outro
tr: Takoz malzemesi: Alüminyum; Plastik; Diğer
es: Material del culatín: Aluminio; Plástico; Otros
fi: Nokki-materiaali: Alumiini; Muovi; Muu
sv: Nock - material: Aluminium; Plast; Övrigt
da: Kærvmateriale: Aluminum; Plast; Andet
nb: Hakkmateriale: Aluminium; Plast; Annet
cs: Materiál končíku: Hliník; Plast; Jiné
sk-SK: Materiál končeka: Hliník; Plast; Iné
bg-BG: Материал на нока: Алуминий; Пластмаса; Други
ro-RO: Material nock: Aluminiu; Plastic; Altele
nl: Materiaal nok: Aluminium; Plastic; Andere
pl: Materiał nasadki: Aluminium; Tworzywo sztuczne; Inne
zh-CN: 箭尾材质: 铝; 塑料; 其他
pt-PT: Material do pino: Alumínio; Plástico; Outro
lt-LT: Galiuko medžiaga: Aliuminis; Plastikas; Kita
hr-HR: Materijal nocka: Aluminij; Plastika; Ostalo
ko: 노크 소재: 알루미늄; 플라스틱; 기타
it: Materiale della cocca: Alluminio; Plastica; Altro
sl-SI: Material zareze: Aluminij; Plastika; Drugo
ja: ノックマテリアル: アルミニウム; プラスチック; その他
el: Υλικό ουράς: Αλουμίνιο; Πλαστικό; Άλλο
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำน็อคลูกธนู: อะลูมิเนียม; พลาสติก; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 凹槽材質: 鋁; 塑膠; 其他
de: Nockenmaterial: Aluminium; Kunststoff; Sonstiges
hu: Nock anyaga: Alumínium; Műanyag; Egyéb
vi: Vật liệu vòng đeo cổ: Nhôm; Nhựa; Khác
fr: Matériau de l’encoche: Aluminum; Plastique; Autre